Utah statutes.
31A-30-210.   State contract requirements -- Employer default plans.

(1)  This section applies to an employer who is required to offer its employees a health benefit plan as a condition of qualifying for a state contract under:

(a)  Section 17B-2a-818.5;

(b)  Section 19-1-206;

(c)  Subsection 63A-5-205(3);

(d)  Section 63C-9-403;

(e)  Section 72-6-107.5; and

(f)  Section 79-2-404.

(2)  An employer described in Subsection (1) shall, when selecting the default plan required in Section 31A-30-204, select a default plan that is "qualified health insurance coverage" as defined in the sections listed in Subsections (1)(a) through (f).

